Oklahoma, session 2026, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7201 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensed practitioner shall, prior to the prescription of


any psychotropic drug to a patient, offer to administer a


pharmacogenomic test to the patient for the purpose of guiding the


decisions of the licensed practitioner with respect to how the


patient’s genes may react to certain medications.


B. The licensed practitioner shall, to the best of the licensed


practitioner’s knowledge, inform the patient of the efficacy of


pharmacogenomic testing. The licensed practitioner shall inform the

Req. No. 496 Page 1


patient of whether or not the pharmacogenomic test to be


administered is approved by the United States Food and Drug


Administration. The licensed practitioner shall obtain the


patient’s informed consent prior to ordering a pharmacogenomic test.


If the practitioner is aware of the cost of the pharmacogenomic


test, the practitioner shall provide an estimate to the patient of


such cost.


C. If a patient provides informed consent to receive a


pharmacogenomic test, the licensed practitioner shall order the


pharmacogenomic test and administer such test to the patient prior


to the prescription of any psychotropic medication.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-496 DC 12/16/2024 12:38:56 PM





















Req. No. 496 Page 2